Utah statutes.
10-3-712.   Effective date.

Ordinances shall become effective 20 days after publication or posting or 30 days after final passage by the governing body, whichever is closer to the date of final passage, but ordinances may become effective at an earlier or later date after publication or posting if so provided in the ordinance.



Amended by Chapter 42, 1983 General Session

